Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 22
REFORMATORY

27-22-101 to 27-22-110. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article repealed, p. 955, § 37, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 3 of chapter 105 in C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1977, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.